Utah statutes.
4-33-7.   Inspection, sampling, testing and analysis of fuels by department.
(1) The department shall periodically sample, inspect, analyze and test motor
fuels dispensed in this state and may enter any public premises or vehicle for
the purpose of determining compliance with this chapter.
(2)  Methods of sampling, testing, analyzing and designating motor fuels shall
accord with those specified and published by the American Society for Testing
and Materials. The department shall use the latest published standards of the
American Society for Testing and Materials.
(3)  Upon request the department shall pay the posted price for samples and
the person from whom the sample is taken shall give a signed receipt
evidencing payment.
(4)  Tests and analyses conducted by the department shall be prima facie
evidence of the facts shown by such tests in any court proceeding.
